apertium-panm/apertium-pan.pan_Guru.dix
    <pardef n="ਦੁਬਲਾ__adj">
      <e><p><l>ਾ</l><r>ਾ<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਾ</l><r>ਾ<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਾ</l><r>ਾ<s n="adj"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਾ</l><r>ਾ<s n="adj"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੇ</l><r>ਾ<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੇ</l><r>ਾ<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੇ</l><r>ਾ<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੀ</l><r>ਾ<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੀ</l><r>ਾ<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੀ</l><r>ਾ<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੀ</l><r>ਾ<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ਗਲਤ__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <!-- SECTION: Postpositions -->

    <pardef n="ਪਰ__post">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="post"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Nouns -->

    <pardef n="ਰਾਜ__n_m">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਾਂ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਾਂ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ਕਾਨ__n_m">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਨਾਂ</l><r>ਾਨ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਨਾਂ</l><r>ਾਨ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ਬਾਰ__n_m">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    

    <pardef n="ਬਾਤ__n_f">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
<!--      <e><p><l/>ਤੋਂ<r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e> -->
      <e><p><l>ਾਂ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਾਂ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ਨਦੀ__n_f">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
<!--      <e><p><l/>ਓਂ<r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e> -->
      <e><p><l>ਆਂ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਆਂ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ਤੀਵੀ/ਂ__n_f">
      <e><p><l>ਂ</l><r>ਂ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਂ</l><r>ਂ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਆਂ</l><r>ਂ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਆਂ</l><r>ਂ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ਪੂਜਾ__n_f">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਵਾਂ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਵਾਂ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ਸੂਬ/ਾ__n_m">
      <e><p><l>ਾ</l><r>ਾ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੇ</l><r>ਾ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੇ</l><r>ਾ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਿਆਂ</l><r>ਾ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ਖ਼ੁਦਾਈ__n_f">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ਦੁਨੀਆ/ਂ__n_f">
      <e><p><l>ਂ</l><r>ਂ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਂ</l><r>ਂ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਵਾਂ</l><r>ਂ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਵਾਂ</l><r>ਂ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ਅਮਰੀਕੀ__n_m">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਆਂ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਆਂ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ਮ/ਾ__n_m">
      <e><p><l>ਾ</l><r>ਾ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ੇ</l><r>ਾ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ੇ</l><r>ਾ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ਾਂ</l><r>ਾ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- SECTION: Adverbs -->      
    <pardef n="ਅਜ੍ਜ__adv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- SECTION: Verbs -->     

    <e lm="ਵਿਚ" ><i>ਵਿਚ</i><par n="ਪਰ__post"/></e>
    <e lm="ਅਨੁਸਾਰ"><i>ਅਨੁਸਾਰ</i><par n="ਪਰ__post"/></e>
    <e lm="ਅੱਗੇ"><i>ਅੱਗੇ</i><par n="ਪਰ__post"/></e>
    <e lm="ਦਾ"><i>ਦਾ</i><par n="ਪਰ__post"/></e>
    <e lm="ਖ਼ਿਲਾਫ਼"><i>ਖ਼ਿਲਾਫ਼</i><par n="ਪਰ__post"/></e>
    <e lm="ਦੌਰਾਨ"><i>ਦੌਰਾਨ</i><par n="ਪਰ__post"/></e>
    <e lm="ਨੀਚੇ"><i>ਨੀਚੇ</i><par n="ਪਰ__post"/></e>
    <e lm="ਪਰ"><i>ਪਰ</i><par n="ਪਰ__post"/></e>
    <e lm="ਬਤੌਰ"><i>ਬਤੌਰ</i><par n="ਪਰ__post"/></e>
    <e lm="ਬਿਨਾਂ"><i>ਬਿਨਾਂ</i><par n="ਪਰ__post"/></e>
    <e lm="ਵਿੱਚ"><i>ਵਿੱਚ</i><par n="ਪਰ__post"/></e>
    <e lm="ਲਈ "><i>ਲਈ </i><par n="ਪਰ__post"/></e>
    <e lm="ਸਹਿਤ"><i>ਸਹਿਤ</i><par n="ਪਰ__post"/></e>
    <e lm="ਬਿਨਾਂ"><i>ਬਿਨਾਂ</i><par n="ਪਰ__post"/></e>
    <e lm="ਨਾਲ"><i>ਨਾਲ</i><par n="ਪਰ__post"/></e>
    <e lm="ਸੂਬਾ"><i>ਸੂਬ</i><par n="ਸੂਬ/ਾ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਜ਼ੁਬਾਨ"><i>ਜ਼ੁਬਾਨ</i><par n="ਬਾਤ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਪੂਜਾ"><i>ਪੂਜਾ</i><par n="ਪੂਜਾ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਗੱਲ"><i>ਗੱਲ</i><par n="ਬਾਤ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਪ੍ਰਕਿਰਤੀ"><i>ਪ੍ਰਕਿਰਤੀ</i><par n="ਨਦੀ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਮਿੱਟੀ"><i>ਮਿੱਟੀ</i><par n="ਨਦੀ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਭਾਸ਼ਾ"><i>ਭਾਸ਼ਾ</i><par n="ਪੂਜਾ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਖੇਹ"><i>ਖੇਹ</i><par n="ਬਾਤ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਪਛਾਣ"><i>ਪਛਾਣ</i><par n="ਬਾਤ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਆਦਤ"><i>ਆਦਤ</i><par n="ਬਾਤ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਪੁਸਤਕ"><i>ਪੁਸਤਕ</i><par n="ਬਾਤ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਮਾਤਾ"><i>ਮਾਤਾ</i><par n="ਪੂਜਾ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਕਿਰਿਆ"><i>ਕਿਰਿਆ</i><par n="ਪੂਜਾ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਫਿਤਰਤ"><i>ਫਿਤਰਤ</i><par n="ਬਾਤ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਮਹਿਲਾ"><i>ਮਹਿਲਾ</i><par n="ਪੂਜਾ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਰਾਖੀ"><i>ਰਾਖੀ</i><par n="ਨਦੀ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਇਬਾਦਤ"><i>ਇਬਾਦਤ</i><par n="ਬਾਤ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਪੋਥੀ"><i>ਪੋਥੀ</i><par n="ਨਦੀ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਨਦੀ"><i>ਨਦੀ</i><par n="ਨਦੀ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਨਾਰੀ"><i>ਨਾਰੀ</i><par n="ਨਦੀ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਕੁਦਰਤ"><i>ਕੁਦਰਤ</i><par n="ਬਾਤ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਮਰਗ"><i>ਮਰਗ</i><par n="ਬਾਤ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਬੰਦਗੀ"><i>ਬੰਦਗੀ</i><par n="ਨਦੀ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਬਾਤ"><i>ਬਾਤ</i><par n="ਬਾਤ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਦੀਵਾਰ"><i>ਦੀਵਾਰ</i><par n="ਬਾਤ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਰਾਜ"><i>ਰਾਜ</i><par n="ਰਾਜ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਰਂਗ"><i>ਰਂਗ</i><par n="ਬਾਰ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਖ਼ੁਦਾਈ"><i>ਖ਼ੁਦਾਈ</i><par n="ਖ਼ੁਦਾਈ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਕ੍ਰਿਆ"><i>ਕ੍ਰਿਆ</i><par n="ਪੂਜਾ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਖ਼ਲਕਤ"><i>ਖ਼ਲਕਤ</i><par n="ਬਾਤ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਦੁਨੀਆਂ"><i>ਦੁਨੀਆ</i><par n="ਦੁਨੀਆ/ਂ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਆਰਾਧਨਾ"><i>ਆਰਾਧਨਾ</i><par n="ਪੂਜਾ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਭੂਮਿਕਾ"><i>ਭੂਮਿਕਾ</i><par n="ਪੂਜਾ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਅਦਾਕਾਰੀ"><i>ਅਦਾਕਾਰੀ</i><par n="ਨਦੀ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਤੀਵੀਂ"><i>ਤੀਵੀ</i><par n="ਤੀਵੀ/ਂ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਅਮਰੀਕੀ"><i>ਅਮਰੀਕੀ</i><par n="ਅਮਰੀਕੀ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਮੌਤ"><i>ਮੌਤ</i><par n="ਬਾਤ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਦੇਵੀ"><i>ਦੇਵੀ</i><par n="ਨਦੀ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਰਾਜਧਾਨੀ"><i>ਰਾਜਧਾਨੀ</i><par n="ਨਦੀ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਮਦਦ"><i>ਮਦਦ</i><par n="ਬਾਤ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਚਰਚਾ"><i>ਚਰਚਾ</i><par n="ਪੂਜਾ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਰਸੋਈ"><i>ਰਸੋਈ</i><par n="ਨਦੀ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਬਾਰ"><i>ਬਾਰ</i><par n="ਬਾਰ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਮਾਹ"><i>ਮਾਹ</i><par n="ਬਾਰ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਦੁਪੱਟਾ"><i>ਦੁਪੱਟ</i><par n="ਸੂਬ/ਾ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਕਮਰਾ"><i>ਕਮਰ</i><par n="ਸੂਬ/ਾ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਸੂਟ"><i>ਸੂਟ</i><par n="ਰਾਜ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਸੁਮਿਤਰਾ"><i>ਸੁਮਿਤਰਾ</i><par n="ਖ਼ੁਦਾਈ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਛਿਪਕਲੀ"><i>ਛਿਪਕਲੀ</i><par n="ਨਦੀ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਕਾਨ"><i>ਕ</i><par n="ਕਾਨ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਮਨ"><i>ਮਨ</i><par n="ਬਾਰ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਤਰਾਂ"><i>ਤਰਾਂ</i><par n="ਬਾਰ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਵਾਂਗ"><i>ਵਾਂਗ</i><par n="ਬਾਰ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਚਿੱਟਾ"><i>ਚਿੱਟਾ</i><par n="ਸੂਬ/ਾ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਸਾਡਾ"><i>ਸਾਡ</i><par n="ਸੂਬ/ਾ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਘਰ"><i>ਘਰ</i><par n="ਬਾਰ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਘੰਟਾ"><i>ਘੰਟ</i><par n="ਮ/ਾ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਪਲ"><i>ਪਲ</i><par n="ਰਾਜ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਦੰਦ"><i>ਦੰਦ</i><par n="ਰਾਜ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਨਾ"><i>ਨਾ</i><par n="ਰਾਜ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਮਗਰਮੱਛ"><i>ਮਗਰਮੱਛ</i><par n="ਰਾਜ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ਪਿਆਲੀ"><i>ਪਿਆਲੀ</i><par n="ਨਦੀ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਚਾਹ"><i>ਚਾਹ</i><par n="ਖ਼ੁਦਾਈ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਠੋਡੀ"><i>ਠੋਡੀ</i><par n="ਨਦੀ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ਅਗਲਾ"><i>ਅਗਲ</i><par n="ਦੁਬਲਾ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ਦੁਬਲਾ"><i>ਦੁਬਲ</i><par n="ਦੁਬਲਾ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ਪਤਲਾ"><i>ਪਤਲ</i><par n="ਦੁਬਲਾ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ਮੋਟਾ"><i>ਮੋਟ</i><par n="ਦੁਬਲਾ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ਤਿਖਾ"><i>ਤਿਖ</i><par n="ਦੁਬਲਾ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ਵਾਲਾ"><i>ਵਾਲ</i><par n="ਦੁਬਲਾ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ਪਿਛਲਾ"><i>ਪਿਛਲ</i><par n="ਦੁਬਲਾ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ਸਾਉਲਾ"><i>ਸਾਉਲ</i><par n="ਦੁਬਲਾ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ਕਾਲਾ"><i>ਕਾਲ</i><par n="ਦੁਬਲਾ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ਜਿਹਾ"><i>ਜਿਹ</i><par n="ਦੁਬਲਾ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ਤਰਾਂ"><i>ਤਰਾਂ</i><par n="ਗਲਤ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ਵਾਂਗ"><i>ਵਾਂਗ</i><par n="ਗਲਤ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ਘੱਟ"><i>ਘੱਟ</i><par n="ਗਲਤ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ਹੀ"><i>ਹੀ</i><par n="ਗਲਤ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ਸਭ"><i>ਸਭ</i><par n="ਗਲਤ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ਉਹੀ"><i>ਉਹੀ</i><par n="ਗਲਤ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ਅਜ੍ਜ"><i>ਅਜ੍ਜ</i><par n="ਅਜ੍ਜ__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ਭੀਤਰ"><i>ਭੀਤਰ</i><par n="ਅਜ੍ਜ__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ਵੀ"><i>ਵੀ</i><par n="ਅਜ੍ਜ__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ਨਹੀਂ"><i>ਨਹੀਂ</i><par n="ਅਜ੍ਜ__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ਉਪਰ"><i>ਉਪਰ</i><par n="ਅਜ੍ਜ__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ਬਿੱਟਰ"><i>ਬਿੱਟਰ</i><par n="ਅਜ੍ਜ__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ਝਟ"><i>ਝਟ</i><par n="ਅਜ੍ਜ__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ਤੇਜ਼ੀ"><i>ਤੇਜ਼ੀ</i><par n="ਅਜ੍ਜ__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ਵਿਚ"><i>ਵਿਚ</i><par n="ਅਜ੍ਜ__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ਕਦੇ"><i>ਕਦੇ</i><par n="ਅਜ੍ਜ__adv"/></e>
